Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.110

Nonresident applicants—Consent for service of process.

Every applicant for certification, licensing, or registration who is not a resident of this state shall submit, with the application for certification, licensing, or registration an irrevocable consent that service of process upon him or her may be made by service on the director if, in an action against the applicant in a court of this state arising out of the applicant's activities as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee, the plaintiff cannot, in the exercise of due diligence, obtain personal service upon the applicant.

[ 2005 c 339 s 8; 1993 c 30 s 11; 1989 c 414 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.